nouns-new.lexc
Multichar_Symbols   +N +Sg +Pl                      ! Number (Singular or Plural)
                    +1SgPos +2SgPos +3SgPos         ! Possession (^im, ^ing, ^i)
                    +1PlPos +2PlPos +3PlPos         ! Possession (^imiz, ^ingiz, ^lari)
                    +Nom +Abl +Loc +Acc +Dat +Gen   ! Case Endings (^0, ^dan, ^da, ^ni, ^ga, ^ning)
                    +1SgPrd +2SgPrd +2HnPrd +3SgPrd ! Predicative (^man, ^san, ^siz, ^0)
                    +1PlPrd +2PlPrd +3PlPrd         ! Predicative (^miz, ^sizlar, ^lar)
                    +Dbt1 +Dbt2 +Dbt3               ! Doubt (^mish, ^chi, ^a(ya))
                    +Qst1 +Qst2 +Qst3               ! Question (^mi, chi, ^a(ya)) 
                    +DbtQst1 +DbtQst2 +DbtQst3      ! Doubt-Question (^mi, ^a(ya), mikan)
                    +Ast                            ! Astonishment (^-chi)
                    +Neg                            ! Negative
                    +Abs                            ! Absence
                    +Hnf       
                    +Aff        
                    +Dim                             !
                    +Drg
                    +Sep
                    +Adc
                    +Bor
                    +Aff
                    +Cmp
                    +Res
                    @U.GEN.ON@ @U.GEN.OFF@


LEXICON Root
                Noun;

LEXICON Noun
maslahat        NBeg;

LEXICON NBeg
+N+Sg:0         NInt1;





LEXICON NInt1
                ! NInt1Group ;
                NInt2;

! LEXICON NInt1Group
!                 Plural;
!                 Diminutive;
!                 Derogative;

! LEXICON Plural
! +N+Sg:lar       NInt2;

! LEXICON Diminutive
! +Dim:xon        NInt2;

! LEXICON Derogative
! +Drg:cha        NInt2;





LEXICON NInt2 
                NInt2Group;
                NInt3;

LEXICON NInt2Group
                Possession;

LEXICON Possession
+1SgPos:im      NInt3;
+2SgPos:ing     NInt3;
+3SgPos:i       NInt3;
+1PlPos:imiz    NInt3;
+2PlPos:ingiz   NInt3;
+3PlPos:lari    NInt3;    





LEXICON NInt3 
                NInt3Group;
                NInt4;

LEXICON NInt3Group
                Predicate ;
                Pronominalizing ;
                Honorific ;

LEXICON Pronominalizing
+Prn:niki      NInt4;

LEXICON Predicate
+1SgPrd:man     NInt6; 
+2SgPrd:san     NInt6;
+2HnPrd:siz     NInt6;
+3SgPrd:0       NInt6;

LEXICON Honorific 
+Hnf:lar        #;





LEXICON NInt4
                NInt4Group;
                NInt5;

LEXICON NInt4Group
                Case ;
                Affiliating ;
                Adjectivizing ;
                Bordering ; 

LEXICON Case
+Nom:0          NInt5;
+Abl:dan        NInt5;
+Loc:da         NInt5;
+Acc:ni         NInt5;
+Dat:ga         NInt5;
+Gen:ning       NInt5; 

LEXICON Affiliating
+Aff:ligi       NInt11; ! ??

LEXICON Adjectivizing
+Adz:dagi       NInt12;

LEXICON Bordering 
+Bor:gacha      NInt7;





LEXICON NInt5
                NInt5Group;
                NInt6;

LEXICON NInt5Group
                Astonishment ;
                Negation ;
                Absence ;
                Separation ; 
                Comparative ;

LEXICON Astonishment
+Ast:-chi       # ;

LEXICON Negation
+Neg:mas        NInt10 ;

LEXICON Absence 
+Abs:siz        NInt10 ;

LEXICON Separation
+Sep:gina       NInt9 ;

LEXICON Comparative
+Cmp:chalik     NInt8 ;





LEXICON NInt6 !COMES FROM PREDICATE
                NInt6Group ;
                #;

LEXICON NInt6Group
                Doubt;
                Question;
                DoubtQuestion;
                Affirmative;
                Reassuring;


LEXICON Doubt
+Dbt1:mish      # ;

LEXICON Question
+Qst1:mi        NInt13 ;

LEXICON DoubtQuestion 
+DbtQst1:mikan  NInt13 ;

LEXICON Affirmative
+Aff:kan        # ;

LEXICON Reassuring 
+Res:-ku        # ;





LEXICON NInt7
                NInt7Group;
                NInt8;

LEXICON NInt7Group
                Predicate;
                Affiliating;
                Separation ;




LEXICON NInt8
                NInt8Group ;

LEXICON NInt8Group
                Negation ;
                NInt6;




LEXICON NInt9
                NInt9Group ;
                NInt10 ;


LEXICON NInt9Group 
                Absence ;
                Astonishment ;
                Negation ;

LEXICON NInt10
                Predicate ;
                Honorific ;
                NInt6;


                


LEXICON NInt11 
                NInt11Group;
                NInt12;

LEXICON NInt11Group
                Absence ;
                Predicate ;

LEXICON NInt12  
                NInt12Group;

LEXICON NInt12Group
                Case ;
                Comparative ;
                Separation ;
                Negation ;
                NInt6;





LEXICON NInt13
                NInt13Group ;
                # ;

LEXICON NInt13Group
                Honorific ;





LEXICON NInt15
                NInt15Group ;
                # ;

LEXICON NInt15Group
                ! Case ;
                Astonishment ;
                ! Pronominalizing ;
                ! Adjectivizing ;
                ! Affiliating ;
                ! NInt6 ;








! ! POSSESSION SUFFIXES (USUALLY COME AFTER STEM)

! LEXICON PossessionCont
!                 Possession ;

! LEXICON PredicateCont 
!                 Predicative ;

! LEXICON Predicative
!                 PredicativeSingular ;
!                 PredicativePlural ;




! LEXICON PredicativeSingular
! +1SgPrd:man     PredEnd;
! +2SgPrd:san     PredEnd;
! +2HnPrd:siz     PredEnd;
! +3SgPrd:0       PredEnd;

! LEXICON PredicativePlural
! +1PlPrd:miz     PredEnd;
! +2PlPrd:sizlar  PredEnd;
! +3PlPrd:lar     PredEnd;



! LEXICON Possession
! +1SgPos:im      NInt3;
! +2SgPos:ing     NInt3;
! +3SgPos:i       NInt3;
! +1PlPos:imiz    NInt3;
! +2PlPos:ingiz   NInt3;
! +3PlPos:lari    NInt3;
!                 NInt3;
!                 Nend;

! LEXICON NInt3
!                 DoubtCont;


! LEXICON DoubtCont
!                 Doubt;
!                 Question;
!                 DoubtQuestion;


! ! CASE ENDINGS (USUALLY COME AFTER Possession OR NUMBER AFFIX)
! LEXICON Case
! +Nom:0          NInt2;
! +Abl:dan        NInt2;
! +Loc:da         NInt2;
! +Acc:ni         NInt2;
! +Dat:ga         NInt2;
! @U.GEN.OFF@+Gen:@U.GEN.OFF@ning       NInt2; ! ELIMINATED "-NINGMISH" SINCE IT IS TURNED INTO "-NIKIMISH".
!                 NInt2;


! ! DERIVATIONAL SUFFIXES (USUALLY COME AFTER POSSESSION, CASE OR NUMBER AFFIXES)
! LEXICON NInt2
!                 @U.GEN.ON@ Derivational ;
!                 # ;

! LEXICON Derivational
!                 Doubt ;
!                 Astonishment ;

! ! DOUBT AND ASTONISHMENT ARE STRUCTURALLY EQUIVALENT AFFIXES

! LEXICON Doubt
! +Dbt1:mish      # ;
! +Dbt2:dir       # ;
! +Dbt3:ov        # ;

! LEXICON Astonishment
! +Ast:-chi       # ;


! ! PRESUMABLY COMES AFTER POSSESSION 
! LEXICON Pronominalizing 
! +Pnm:niki       # ;


! ! PREDICATIVE SUFFIXES (USUALLY COME AT THE END)
! LEXICON Predicative
!                 PredicativeSingular ;
!                 PredicativePlural ;

! LEXICON PredicativeSingular
! +1SgPrd:man     PredEnd;
! +2SgPrd:san     PredEnd;
! +2HnPrd:siz     PredEnd;
! +3SgPrd:0       PredEnd;

! LEXICON PredicativePlural
! +1PlPrd:miz     PredEnd;
! +2PlPrd:sizlar  PredEnd;
! +3PlPrd:lar     PredEnd;

! LEXICON PredEnd
!                 # ;
